District of Columbia statutes.
41-121

Crediting of dividends, interest, or increments to owner’s account.

Whenever property other than money is paid or delivered to the Mayor under this chapter, any dividends, interest, or other increments realized or accruing, on the property at or before liquidation or conversion thereof into money, shall be credited, upon receipt, to the owner’s account by the Mayor.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 121, 27 DCR 5150

Section References

This section is referenced in § 41-125.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 42-221.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 21 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).